Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 308.4 of Title 75, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. Each agency, as defined in Section 250.3 of this title,

shall conduct a comprehensive review of all existing permanent

rules. Such review shall:

1. Include a total count of all existing, codified, permanent

rules in place as of the effective date of this act;


Req. No. 14335 Page 1

2. Include a baseline count of rules which shall be determined
by calculating seventy-five percent (75%) of the total count
identified in paragraph 1 of this subsection; and
3. Shall identify all rules that are obsolete, duplicative,
ineffective, unnecessary, or unduly burdensome.
B. Each agency shall revoke, consolidate, or amend at minimum
twenty-five percent (25%) of the agency's total existing permanent
rules within two (2) years of the effective date of this act to
reach the baseline rule count described in paragraph 2 of subsection
A of this section.
C. Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, permanent
rules that were promulgated by the agency in accordance with
express, specific authority from statute may be excluded from the
total rule count described in paragraph 1 of subsection A of this
section.
D. Each agency shall submit an annual written compliance report
and certification to the Governor, the Speaker of the House, the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Legislative
Administrative Rules Committees. The written compliance report
shall include:
1. The agency's total rule count as defined in subsection A of
this section;
2. The agency's baseline rule count as defined in subsection A
of this section;
Req. No. 14335 Page 2

3. A list of rules that were recommended for repeal or
consolidation;
4. A list of rules excluded from the total rule count on the
basis that they were promulgated with express, specific statutory
authority, including citations to such authority;
5. A justification for retaining each major rule as defined by
Paragraph 11 of Section 250.3 of this title; and
6. The percentage of rules actually repealed and consolidated
from the total rule count.
E. If the Legislature finds that an agency has not complied
with the requirements of this section, such agency shall be
prohibited from promulgating any permanent rules until further
notice from the Legislature.
F. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to:
1. Require the repeal of permanent rules that were promulgated
in accordance with express, specific authority from statute;
2. Expand agency authority; or
3. Limit legislative authority.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14335 SW 01/10/26



Req. No. 14335 Page 3